Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.020

Theft—Definition, defense.

(1) "Theft" means:

(a) To wrongfully obtain or exert unauthorized control over the property or services of another or the value thereof, with intent to deprive him or her of such property or services; or

(b) By color or aid of deception to obtain control over the property or services of another or the value thereof, with intent to deprive him or her of such property or services; or

(c) To appropriate lost or misdelivered property or services of another, or the value thereof, with intent to deprive him or her of such property or services.

(2) In any prosecution for theft, it shall be a sufficient defense that:

(a) The property or service was appropriated openly and avowedly under a claim of title made in good faith, even though the claim be untenable; or

(b) The property was merchandise pallets that were received by a pallet recycler or repairer in the ordinary course of its business.

[ 2004 c 122 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.

Civil action for shoplifting by adults, minors: RCW 4.24.230.